District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-720

Duty to support illegitimate child.

Repealed.

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 288, Pub. L. 85-94, § 20
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 34, 23 DCR 2544
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-107, title I, § 114, 23 DCR 8737
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748
Acknowledgement of parentage, issuance of new birth certificates, see § 7-210.
1981 Ed., § 30-320.
1973 Ed., § 30-320.